Hawaii statutes.
§476-17 Subsequent inclusion of other
security. In a contract for a sale primarily for a personal, family, or
household purpose, no provision for the subsequent inclusion of title to or a
subsequent lien upon or a subsequent security interest in any goods, other than
the goods which are the subject matter of or original security for the credit
sale, or accessories thereto, or special or auxiliary equipment used in
connection therewith, or in substitution, in whole or in part, for any thereof,
as security for payment of the time sale price, shall be enforceable. [L 1961,
c 102, pt of §1; Supp, §201A-15; HRS §476-16; am and ren L 1984, c 86, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next